basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX B1   out         uj         [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ujme       [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ujte       [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ul         [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ula        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ulo        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         uli        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         uly        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         u          mout
SFX B1   out         eš         mout
SFX B1   out         e          mout
SFX B1   out         eme        mout
SFX B1   out         ete        mout
SFX B1   t           0          mout
SFX B1   out         i          mout
SFX B1   out         ěme        mout
SFX B1   out         ěte        mout
SFX B1   t           nu         tat
SFX B1   t           neš        tat
SFX B1   t           ne         tat
SFX B1   t           neme       tat
SFX B1   t           nete       tat
SFX B1   t           nou        tat
SFX B1   t           ň          tat
SFX B1   t           ňme        tat
SFX B1   t           ňte        tat
SFX B1   at          ím         pat
SFX B1   at          íš         pat
SFX B1   at          í          pat
SFX B1   at          íme        pat
SFX B1   at          íte        pat
SFX B1   at          i          pat
SFX B1   at          ěme        pat
SFX B1   at          ěte        pat
SFX B1   rat         řu         rat
SFX B1   rat         řeš        rat
SFX B1   rat         ře         rat
SFX B1   rat         řeme       rat
SFX B1   rat         řete       rat
SFX B1   rat         řou        rat
SFX B1   rat         ř          rat
SFX B1   rat         řme        rat
SFX B1   rat         řte        rat
SFX B1   0           i          [aáeě]t
SFX B1   t           l          [aáeě]t
SFX B1   t           la         [aáeě]t
SFX B1   t           lo         [aáeě]t
SFX B1   t           li         [aáeě]t
SFX B1   t           ly         [aáeě]t

SFX O1 Y 55
SFX O1   en          na         [os]ten
SFX O1   en          no         [os]ten
SFX O1   en          ni         [os]ten
SFX O1   en          ny         [os]ten
SFX O1   en          nu         [os]ten
SFX O1   0           a          [^os]ten
SFX O1   0           o          [^os]ten
SFX O1   0           i          [^os]ten
SFX O1   0           y          [^os]ten
SFX O1   0           u          [^os]ten
SFX O1   en          na         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O1   en          no         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O1   en          ni         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O1   en          ny         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O1   en          nu         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           a          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           o          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           i          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           y          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           u          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O1   0           a          [^e]n
SFX O1   0           o          [^e]n
SFX O1   0           i          [^e]n
SFX O1   0           y          [^e]n
SFX O1   0           u          [^e]n
SFX O1   0           a          [^nlvý]
SFX O1   0           o          [^nlvý]
SFX O1   0           i          [^nlvýghkr]
SFX O1   0           y          [^nlvý]
SFX O1   0           u          [^nlvý]
SFX O1   k           ci         k
SFX O1   r           ři         r
SFX O1   0           a          [^e]l
SFX O1   0           o          [^e]l
SFX O1   0           i          [^e]l
SFX O1   0           y          [^e]l
SFX O1   0           a          [^š]el
SFX O1   0           o          [^š]el
SFX O1   0           i          [^š]el
SFX O1   0           y          [^š]el
SFX O1   el          la         šel
SFX O1   el          lo         šel
SFX O1   el          li         šel
SFX O1   el          ly         šel
SFX O1   ev          va         ev
SFX O1   ev          vo         ev
SFX O1   ev          vi         ev
SFX O1   ev          vy         ev
SFX O1   ev          vu         ev
SFX O1   0           a          [^e]v
SFX O1   0           o          [^e]v
SFX O1   0           i          [^e]v
SFX O1   0           y          [^e]v
SFX O1   0           u          [^e]v
SFX O1   ý           o          ý

SFX X1 Y 19
SFX X1   a           ouc        a
SFX X1   a           ouce       a
SFX X1   e           íc         e
SFX X1   e           íce        e
SFX X1   ě           íc         ě
SFX X1   ě           íce        ě
SFX X1   0           ši         [dv]
SFX X1   0           še         [dv]
SFX X1   0           ši         et
SFX X1   0           še         et
SFX X1   out         uv         out
SFX X1   out         uvši       out
SFX X1   out         uvše       out
SFX X1   t           v          [ai]t
SFX X1   t           vši        [ai]t
SFX X1   t           vše        [ai]t
SFX X1   ýt          yv         ýt
SFX X1   ýt          yvši       ýt
SFX X1   ýt          yvše       ýt
