basic-cs.dic
bezpečný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
bezpečný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
bit/H1O1N1
blátivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
blízký/Y1K1R1O1
blízký/Y1K1R1O1
bos/O1
bouřlivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
bál/H1O1N1
chmurný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
daleký/Y1R1O1N1
dlužný/Y1K1O1Y2
dobrat/A1T1X1N1
dohnal/O1N1
dojet/I1O1N1
dostoupit/A1T1X1N1
dostál/O1N1
doznat/J1T1X1N1
drobný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
drobný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
dusný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
dávný/Y1K1O1N1Y2
dělitelný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
děsný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
hluboký/Y1K1R1O1N1
hlučný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
hlučný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
hořký/Y1K1R1O1N1
hořký/Y1K1R1O1N1
hrd/O1
jasný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
jemný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
jemný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
klidný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
kluzký/Y1K1R1O1N1
kolmý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
krušný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
laciný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
lačný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
lhostejný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
libý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
libý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
liduprázdný/Y1K1R1O1
líný/Y1R1O1Y2
malinký/Y1K1O1
maličký/Y1K1O1
maličký/Y1K1O1
mdlý/Y1K1R1O1N1
milý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
milý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
mlhavý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
možný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
možný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
mrazivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
musil/O1N1
měnit/A1T1X1N1
nabrat/A1T1X1N1
nahlédnout/A1T1X1N1
najet/I1O1N1
naprostý/Y1O1
narazit/A1C1X1N1
nastoupit/A1T1X1N1
nutný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
nutný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
nějaký/Y1R1O1
obejda/P1V1X1N1XD
obhlédnout/A1T1X1N1
objet/I1O1N1
oblačný/Y1K1R1O1N1
oblíbit/A1T1X1N1
obměnit/A1T1X1N1
obrat/A1T1X1N1H1
obstoupit/A1T1X1N1
odbyt/H1O1N1
odchýlit/A1T1X1N1
odebrat/A1T1X1N1
odehnal/O1N1
odejet/I1O1N1
odjet/I1O1N1
odliv/H1X1N1
odměnit/A1T1X1N1
odra/X1N1
odstoupit/A1T1X1N1
odříznutý/Y1K1R1N1O1Y2
optat/J1T1X1N1
osel/O1N1P1XF
ostrý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
ozřejmit/A1T1X1N1
ošklivý/Y1K1R1O1Y2
ošklivý/Y1K1R1O1Y2
pit/O1N1
platný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
platný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
plný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
pobrat/A1T1X1N1
pochmurný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
podrazit/A1C1X1N1
podstoupit/A1T1X1N1
poklidný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
polknout/A1T1X1N1
poloprázdný/Y1O1
políbit/A1T1X1N1
popojet/I1O1N1
poptat/J1T1X1N1
porazit/A1C1X1N1
posel/O1N1P1V1XF
postoupit/A1T1X1N1
pozměnit/A1T1X1N1
poznat/J1T1X1N1
pošmourný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
probrat/A1T1X1N1
prohlédnout/A1T1X1N1
prohlídnout/A1T1X1N1
projet/I1O1N1
proměnit/A1T1X1N1
proměnlivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
prorazit/A1C1X1N1
prost/O1
prostoupit/A1T1X1N1
prázdný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
přebrat/A1T1X1N1
předjet/I1O1N1
předlouhý/Y1R1O1
přehlédnout/A1T1X1N1
přejet/I1O1N1
překontrolovat/A1T1X1N1
přeliv/H1X1N1
přeměnit/A1T1X1N1
přerazit/A1C1X1N1
přestoupit/A1T1X1N1
přetěžký/Y1K1R1O1
přibrat/A1T1X1N1
přibyl/O1N1
přijet/I1O1N1
přislíbit/A1T1X1N1
přistoupit/A1T1X1N1
přiznat/J1T1X1N1
přímý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
přímý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
rozebrat/A1T1X1N1
rozehnal/O1N1
rozestoupit/A1T1X1N1
rozeznat/J1T1X1N1
rozhlédnout/A1T1X1N1
rozjet/I1O1N1
rozpoznat/J1T1X1N1
rozptýlit/A1T1X1N1
rušný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
rád/O1
sebrat/A1T1X1N1
sehnal/O1N1
sestoupit/A1T1X1N1
set/O1N1
seznat/J1T1X1N1
sjet/I1O1N1
slepý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
slizký/Y1K1R1O1
slunečný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
slíbit/A1T1X1N1
smutný/Y1R1O1N1Y2
směnit/A1T1X1N1
snadný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
snadný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
spolknout/A1T1X1N1
srazit/A1C1X1N1
stojatý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
sychravý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
teskný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
těsný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
ubrat/A1T1X1N1
uchýlit/A1T1X1N1
ujet/I1O1N1
urazit/A1C1X1N1
usmrtit/A1C1X1N1
ustoupit/A1T1X1N1
uznat/J1T1X1N1
uříznutý/Y1K1R1N1O1Y2
valuta/Z1X1Q1
veselý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
veselý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
vjet/I1O1N1
vlažný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
vliv/H1X1N1
volný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
volný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
vrazit/A1C1X1N1
vybrat/A1T1X1N1
vydra/X1N1Z1Q1
vyhlédnout/A1T1X1N1
vyhrotit/A1C1X1N1
vyjet/I1O1N1
vyměnit/A1T1X1N1
vyrazit/A1C1X1N1
vysoký/Y1K1R1O1N1
vyznat/J1T1X1N1
vzdušný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
věda/X1N1Z1Q1
větrný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
zabrat/A1T1X1N1
zahlédnout/A1T1X1N1
zajet/I1O1N1
zaměnit/A1T1X1N1
zanedbat/J1T1X1N1
zarazit/A1C1X1N1
zastoupit/A1T1X1N1
zažehnout/A1T1X1N1
zeptat/J1T1X1N1
zhlédnout/A1T1X1N1
zkontrolovat/A1T1X1N1
zliv/X1N1
zmýlit/A1T1X1N1
změnit/A1T1X1N1
zřejmý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
úděsný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
úzký/Y1K1R1O1
řídký/Y1K1R1O1N1
šikmý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
široký/Y1K1R1O1N1
žal/H1O1N1
